Maryland, session 2025, HB1262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–205.1.
(a) In this section, “CCR standard” means the college and career readiness
standards established under this section.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1262*

HOUSE BILL 1262
(g) (1) Subject to [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (4) of this subsection,
[beginning in the 2023–2024 school year,] each county board shall provide all students who
meet the CCR standard required under subsection (c) of this section with access to the
following post college and career readiness (post–CCR) pathways, at no cost to the student
or the student’s parents, including the cost of any fees:
(i) A competitive entry college preparatory program, chosen by the
county board, consisting of:
1. The International Baccalaureate Diploma Program;
2. The Cambridge AICE Diploma Program; or
3. A comparable program consisting of Advanced Placement
courses specified by the College Board;
(ii) A program that allows a student, through an early college
program or dual enrollment at a student’s high school and an institution of higher
education to earn:
1. An associate degree; or
2. At least 60 credits toward a bachelor’s degree; and
(iii) A robust set of career and technology education programs that
are recommended by the CTE Skills Standards Advisory Committee and approved by the
CTE Committee and that allow students to complete:
1. A credit or noncredit certificate or license program, course,
or sequence of courses, including a program, course, or courses taken through dual
enrollment under § 15–127 of this article, at a secondary or postsecondary institution,
through an Advanced Placement course at a secondary institution, or through an
apprenticeship sponsor that leads to an industry recognized occupational–credential or
postsecondary certificate;
2. A registered apprenticeship program approved by the
Division of Workforce Development and Adult Learning within the Maryland Department
of Labor; or
3. A youth apprenticeship program, under Title 18, Subtitle
18 of this article.
(2) (I) [Each] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, EACH public high school shall provide access to the programs described
under paragraph (1) of this subsection through that public school or through another public
school in the county.

HOUSE BILL 1262 3
(II) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, A COUNTY BOARD MAY DEVELOP AND ESTABLISH INCOME
ELIGIBILITY GUIDELINES AND PROCEDURES FOR PAYMENT OF COSTS FOR THE
POST–CCR PATHWAY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
2. A STUDENT WITH A FAMILY INCOME BELOW 400% OF
THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL SHALL BE PROVIDED ACCESS TO THE POST–CCR
PATHWAY UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION AT NO COST TO THE
STUDENT OR THE STUDENT’S PARENTS.
(3) (i) Each student who meets the CCR standard required under
subsection (c) of this section shall be enrolled in at least one post–CCR pathway described
in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(ii) Each student who enrolls in a post–CCR pathway shall remain
enrolled in the student’s public high school.
(iii) Each public high school shall provide to every student, regardless
of whether the student is enrolled in a post–CCR pathway, the full range of services to
which the student is entitled, including:
1. Personal, career, and academic advising; and
2. Counseling, in accordance with § 7–126 of this title, to help
the student choose one or more post–CCR pathways, or courses within a post–CCR
pathway, that fits with the student’s educational and career goals.
(iv) Priority for counseling and advising services described under
subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph shall be given to students who have not met the CCR
standard by the end of 10th grade.
(v) Any high school graduation requirements that a student does not
meet by the time the student has completed the assessment required under subsection (d)
of this section shall be provided within the post–CCR pathway the student chooses.
(4) To phase in expansion of dual enrollment to maximize the number of
students who can earn the maximum number of dual enrollment credits consistent with
the phased increases in school funding, for fiscal years 2025 through 2027, the State Board
and the Accountability and Implementation Board, in consultation with each local school
system, may limit the number and types of courses that a student dually enrolled at the
student’s public high school and at an institution of higher education may enroll in during
the school year at the institution of higher education as part of the post–CCR pathway in
accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection and § 15–127 of this article.
(5) (i) The State Board shall adopt regulations to carry out this
subsection.

HOUSE BILL 1262
(ii) The regulations shall include standards that:
1. Guarantee, to the extent practicable, statewide uniformity
in the quality of the post–CCR pathways;
2. Meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection;
and
3. Require high school graduation credit to be awarded for
any programs administered in accordance with this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.